Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7669.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 17-19 of the General Laws entitled "Conduct of Election and Voting
Equipment, and Supplies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
17-19-24.4. Early voting.
Early voting shall be limited to a total of ten (10) nonconsecutive days preceding election
day and shall include the weekend days immediately preceding the election and eight (8) weekdays.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005073
========